Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.304

Moped.

"Moped" means a motorized device designed to travel with not more than three wheels in contact with the ground and having an electric or a liquid fuel motor with a cylinder displacement not exceeding fifty cubic centimeters which produces no more than two gross brake horsepower (developed by a prime mover, as measured by a brake applied to the driving shaft) that is capable of propelling the device at not more than thirty miles per hour on level ground.

[ 2009 c 275 s 1; 1990 c 250 s 18; 1987 c 330 s 702; 1979 ex.s. c 213 s 1.]

NOTES:

Construction—Application of rules—Severability—1987 c 330: See notes following RCW 28B.12.050.